test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-ilesj_gt-norm.yaml
     илесь+V+IV+Aud+PxDu1+Der/Cop+Aor+ScSg3: [илеванониʼ, илевониʼ]
     илесь+V+IV+Aud+PxDu1+Der/Cop+Prt1+ScSg3: [илеванонинзь, илевонинзь]
     илесь+V+IV+Aud+PxDu2+Der/Cop+Aor+ScSg3: [илеванондиʼ, илевондиʼ]
     илесь+V+IV+Aud+PxDu2+Der/Cop+Prt1+ScSg3: [илеванондинзь, илевондинзь]
     илесь+V+IV+Aud+PxDu3+Der/Cop+Aor+ScSg3: [илеванондиʼ, илевондиʼ]
     илесь+V+IV+Aud+PxDu3+Der/Cop+Prt1+ScSg3: [илеванондинзь, илевондинзь]
     илесь+V+IV+Aud+PxPl1+Der/Cop+Aor+ScSg3: [илеванонаˮ,  илевонаˮ]
     илесь+V+IV+Aud+PxPl1+Der/Cop+Prt1+ScSg3: [илеванонаць,  илевонаць]
     илесь+V+IV+Aud+PxPl2+Der/Cop+Aor+ScSg3: [илеванондаˮ, илевондаˮ]
     илесь+V+IV+Aud+PxPl2+Der/Cop+Prt1+ScSg3: [илеванондаць, илевондаць]
     илесь+V+IV+Aud+PxPl3+Der/Cop+Aor+ScSg3: [илеванондоʼ, илевондоʼ]
     илесь+V+IV+Aud+PxPl3+Der/Cop+Prt1+ScSg3: [илеванондонзь, илевондонзь]
     илесь+V+IV+Aud+PxSg1+Der/Cop+Aor+ScSg3: [илеванон, илевон]
     илесь+V+IV+Aud+PxSg1+Der/Cop+Prt1+ScSg3: [илеванонась, илевонась]
     илесь+V+IV+Aud+PxSg2+Der/Cop+Aor+ScSg3: [илеванонд, илевонд]
     илесь+V+IV+Aud+PxSg2+Der/Cop+Prt1+ScSg3: [илеванондась, илевондась]
     илесь+V+IV+Aud+PxSg3+Der/Cop+Aor+ScSg3: [илеванонда, илевонда]
     илесь+V+IV+Aud+PxSg3+Der/Cop+Prt1+ScSg3: [илеванондась, илевондась]
     илесь+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScDu1: илеиниʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScDu2: илеидиʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScDu3: илеихиʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScPl1: илеиваˮ
     илесь+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScPl2: илеидаˮ
     илесь+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScPl3: илеиˮ
     илесь+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScSg1: илеидмʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScSg2: илеин
     илесь+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScSg3: илеи
     илесь+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu1: илеининзь
     илесь+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu2: илеидинзь
     илесь+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu3: илеихинзь
     илесь+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl1: илеиваць
     илесь+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl2: илеидаць
     илесь+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl3: илеиць  
     илесь+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg1: илеидамзь
     илесь+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg2: илеинась
     илесь+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg3: илеись
     илесь+V+IV+ConNeg: илеˮ
#    илесь+V+IV+Dial/W+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: илеханзь
     илесь+V+IV+Evas+Abs: илевоӈгад
     илесь+V+IV+Evas+PxDu1: [илевоӈгаданиʼ, илевоӈгданиʼ]
     илесь+V+IV+Evas+PxDu2: [илевоӈгадандиʼ, илевоӈгдандиʼ]
     илесь+V+IV+Evas+PxDu3: [илевоӈгадандиʼ, илевоӈгдандиʼ]
     илесь+V+IV+Evas+PxPl1: [илевоӈгаданаˮ, илевоӈгданаˮ]
     илесь+V+IV+Evas+PxPl2: [илевоӈгадандаˮ, илевоӈгдандаˮ]
     илесь+V+IV+Evas+PxPl3: [илевоӈгадандоʼ, илевоӈгдандоʼ]
     илесь+V+IV+Evas+PxSg1: [илевоӈгадан, илевоӈгдан]
     илесь+V+IV+Evas+PxSg2: [илевоӈгаданд, илевоӈгданд]
     илесь+V+IV+Evas+PxSg3: [илевоӈгаданда, илевоӈгданда]
     илесь+V+IV+Fut+ConNeg: илеӈгуˮ
     илесь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: илеӈгуниʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: илеӈгудиʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: илеӈгухуʼ 
     илесь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: илеӈгуваˮ
     илесь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: илеӈгудаˮ
     илесь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: илеӈгуˮ            
     илесь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: илеӈгудмʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: илеӈгун
     илесь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: илеӈгу
     илесь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: илеӈгунинзь
     илесь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: илеӈгудинзь
     илесь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: илеӈгухунзь 
     илесь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: илеӈгуваць
     илесь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: илеӈгудаць
     илесь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: илеӈгуць
     илесь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: илеӈгудамзь
     илесь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: илеӈгунась
     илесь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: илеӈгусь
     илесь+V+IV+Fut+Mod/prob+ScDu1: илеӈгодакэниʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Fut+Mod/prob+ScDu2: илеӈгодакэдиʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Fut+Mod/prob+ScDu3: илеӈгодакэхэʼ 
     илесь+V+IV+Fut+Mod/prob+ScPl1: илеӈгодакэваˮ
     илесь+V+IV+Fut+Mod/prob+ScPl2: илеӈгодакэдаˮ
     илесь+V+IV+Fut+Mod/prob+ScPl3: илеӈгодакыˮ  
     илесь+V+IV+Fut+Mod/prob+ScSg1: илеӈгодакэдмʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Fut+Mod/prob+ScSg2: илеӈгодакэн
     илесь+V+IV+Fut+Mod/prob+ScSg3: илеӈгодакы
     илесь+V+IV+GerFin: илеванзь      
     илесь+V+IV+Ger: [иле, илесь] 
     илесь+V+IV+Hab+ConNeg: [илесетуˮ, илесятуˮ]    
     илесь+V+IV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: [илесетыниʼ, илесятыниʼ]
     илесь+V+IV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: [илесетыдиʼ, илесятыдиʼ]
     илесь+V+IV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [илесетыӈахаʼ, илесятыӈахаʼ]
     илесь+V+IV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: [илесетываˮ, илесятываˮ]
     илесь+V+IV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: [илесетыдаˮ, илесятыдаˮ]
     илесь+V+IV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: [илесетыˮ, илесятыˮ]
     илесь+V+IV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: [илесетыдмʼ, илесятыдмʼ]
     илесь+V+IV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: [илесетын, илесятын]
     илесь+V+IV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: [илесеты, илесяты]
     илесь+V+IV+Hab+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu1: [илесетвэниʼ, илесятвэниʼ]
     илесь+V+IV+Hab+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu2: [илесетвэдиʼ, илесятвэдиʼ]
     илесь+V+IV+Hab+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu3: [илесетвэхэʼ, илесятвэхэʼ]
     илесь+V+IV+Hab+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl1: [илесетвэваˮ, илесятвэваˮ]
     илесь+V+IV+Hab+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl2: [илесетвэдаˮ, илесятвэдаˮ]
     илесь+V+IV+Hab+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl3: [илесетвыˮ, илесятвыˮ]     
     илесь+V+IV+Hab+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg1: [илесетвэдмʼ, илесятвэдмʼ]
     илесь+V+IV+Hab+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg2: [илесетвэн, илесятвэн]
     илесь+V+IV+Hab+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg3: [илесетвы, илесятвы]
     илесь+V+IV+Hort+ScDu1: илехэниʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Hort+ScPl1: илехэваˮ
     илесь+V+IV+Hort+ScSg1: илехэдмʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Imprt+ScDu2: иледиʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Imprt+ScPl2: иледаˮ
     илесь+V+IV+Imprt+ScSg2: илеˮ
     илесь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: илениʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: иледиʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: илеӈахаʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: илеваˮ
     илесь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: иледаˮ
     илесь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: илеˮ
     илесь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: иледмʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: илен
     илесь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: иле
     илесь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: иленинзь
     илесь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: илединзь
     илесь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: илеӈаханзь
     илесь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: илеваць
     илесь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: иледаць
     илесь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: илець
     илесь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: [илеманзь, иледамзь]
     илесь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: иленась
     илесь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: илесь
     илесь+V+IV+InfImprf: илева  
     илесь+V+IV+InfPrf: илеˮма  
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScDu1: [иленарханиʼ, иленярханиʼ]
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScDu2: [иленархадиʼ, иленярхадиʼ]
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScDu3: [иленархахаʼ, иленярхахаʼ]
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScPl1: [иленархаваˮ, иленярхаваˮ]
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScPl2: [иленархадаˮ, иленярхадаˮ]
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScPl3: [иленархаˮ, иленярхаˮ]
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScSg1: [иленархадмʼ, иленярхадмʼ]
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScSg2: [иленархан, иленярхан]
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScSg3: [иленарха, иленярха]
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScDu1: иленарханинзь
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScDu2: иленархадинзь
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScDu3: иленархаханзь
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScPl1: иленархаваць
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScPl2: иленархадаць
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScPl3: иленархаць
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScSg1: иленархадамзь
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScSg2: иленарханась
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScSg3: иленархась
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/des+ScDu1: илераваниʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/des+ScDu2: илеравадиʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/des+ScDu3: илеравахаʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/des+ScPl1: илерававаˮ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/des+ScPl2: илеравадаˮ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/des+ScPl3: илераваˮ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/des+ScSg1: илеравадмʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/des+ScSg2: илераван
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/des+ScSg3: илерава
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/futappr+ScDu1: [илевандарханиʼ, илевндарханиʼ]
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/futappr+ScDu2: [илевандархадиʼ, илевндархадиʼ]
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/futappr+ScDu3: [илевандархахаʼ, илевндархахаʼ]
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/futappr+ScPl1: [илевандархаваˮ, илевндархаваˮ]
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/futappr+ScPl2: [илевандархадаˮ, илевндархадаˮ]
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/futappr+ScPl3: [илевандархаˮ, илевндархаˮ]
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/futappr+ScSg1: [илевандархадмʼ, илевндархадмʼ]
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/futappr+ScSg2: [илевандархан, илевндархан]
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/futappr+ScSg3: [илевандарха, илевндарха]
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/hyp+ScDu1: илерахавэниʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/hyp+ScDu2: илерахавэдиʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/hyp+ScDu3: илерахавэхэʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/hyp+ScPl1: илерахавэваˮ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/hyp+ScPl2: илерахавэдаˮ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/hyp+ScPl3: илерахавыˮ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/hyp+ScSg1: илерахавэдмʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/hyp+ScSg2: илерахавэн
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/hyp+ScSg3: илерахавы
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/int+ScDu1: илесаниʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/int+ScDu2: илесадиʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/int+ScDu3: илесахаʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/int+ScPl1: илесаваˮ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/int+ScPl2: илесадаˮ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/int+ScPl3: илесаˮ     
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/int+ScSg1: илесадмʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/int+ScSg2: илесан
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/int+ScSg3: илеса
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu1: илевэниʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu2: илевэдиʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu3: илевэхэʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl1: илевэваˮ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl2: илевэдаˮ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl3: илевыˮ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg1: илевэдмʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg2: илевэн
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg3: илевы
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu1: илевэнинзь
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu2: илевэдинзь
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu3: илевэхэнзь
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl1: илевэваць
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl2: илевэдаць
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl3: [илевыць, илевэць]
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg1: илевэдамзь
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg2: илевэнась
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg3: [илевысь, илевэсь]
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScDu1: илебцуниʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScDu2: илебцудиʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScDu3: илебцухуʼ #yilyebcuх°h
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScPl1: илебцуваˮ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScPl2: илебцудаˮ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScPl3: илебцуˮ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScSg1: илебцудмʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScSg2: илебцун
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScSg3: илебцу
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/obl+ScDu1: илебцакэниʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/obl+ScDu2: илебцакэдиʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/obl+ScDu3: илебцакэхэʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/obl+ScPl1: илебцакэваˮ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/obl+ScPl2: илебцакэдаˮ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/obl+ScPl3: илебцакыˮ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/obl+ScSg1: илебцакэдмʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/obl+ScSg2: илебцакэн
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/obl+ScSg3: илебцакы
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/perfappr+ScDu1: илевэрханиʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/perfappr+ScDu2: илевэрхадиʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/perfappr+ScDu3: илевэрхахаʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/perfappr+ScPl1: илевэрхаваˮ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/perfappr+ScPl2: илевэрхадаˮ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/perfappr+ScPl3: илевэрхаˮ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/perfappr+ScSg1: илевэрхадмʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/perfappr+ScSg2: илевэрхан
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/perfappr+ScSg3: илевэрха
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/perfprob+ScDu1: илевэкэниʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/perfprob+ScDu2: илевэкэдиʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/perfprob+ScDu3: илевэкэхэʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/perfprob+ScPl1: илевэкэваˮ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/perfprob+ScPl2: илевэкэдаˮ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/perfprob+ScPl3: илевэкыˮ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/perfprob+ScSg1: илевэкэдмʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/perfprob+ScSg2: илевэкэн
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/perfprob+ScSg3: илевэкы
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu1: [иленакэниʼ, иленякэниʼ]
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu2: [иленакэдиʼ, иленякэдиʼ]
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu3: [иленакэхэʼ, иленякэхэʼ]
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl1: [иленакэваˮ, иленякэваˮ]
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl2: [иленакэдаˮ, иленякэдаˮ]
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl3: [иленакыˮ, иленякыˮ]
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg1: [иленакэдмʼ, иленякэдмʼ]
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg2: [иленакэн, иленякэн]
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg3: [иленакы, иленякы]
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScDu1: [иленакэнинзь, иленякэнинзь]
